Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 36 Dairy Marketing

Cross references. —

As to the board of agriculture, see §§

11-2-102

to

11-2-104

.

As to agricultural marketing, see ch. 35 of this title.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

to

17-10-253

.

§ 11-36-101.
Short title; legislative declarations; purposes.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Dairy Marketing Act of 1971.”

It is hereby declared:

That a sound and efficiently operated system for distribution, transportation, manufacture, storage, sale, handling, marketing, pricing, processing, production and promotion of dairy products is essential to a prosperous dairy industry within the state of Wyoming and is indispensable to the maintenance of full employment, health, welfare and prosperity of the state;

That the marketing of dairy products in this state in excess of market demands, disorderly marketing of such commodities, improper preparation for market and lack of uniform grading and classification of dairy products, unfair methods of competition in marketing of dairy products and the inability of individual producers, processors or handlers to maintain present markets or to develop new or larger markets for Wyoming dairy products, result in an unreasonable and unnecessary economic waste of part of the agricultural wealth of this state;

That such conditions and waste jeopardize the continued distributing, transporting, manufacturing, selling, storing, handling, marketing, pricing, processing, producing and promoting of adequate food supplies, feed and fiber for the people of this state and other states and prevent producers, processors or handlers of dairy products from obtaining a fair return on their labor, invested capital and expertise;

That such conditions and waste vitally concern the health, peace, safety and welfare of the people of this state;

That the distributing, transporting, manufacturing, selling, storing, handling, marketing, pricing, processing, producing and promoting of dairy products in Wyoming is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. Accordingly, the provisions of this act are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety and welfare of the people of this state.

It is hereby declared to be the purposes of this act to aid agricultural producers, processors or handlers of dairy products in the orderly distributing, transporting, manufacturing, selling, storing, handling, marketing, pricing, processing, producing and promoting of dairy products, to provide methods and means for the development of new and larger markets and to reduce waste in the marketing of dairy products.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-675; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-36-102(a)(xiii).

§ 11-36-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the state board of agriculture;

“Director” means the director of the department of agriculture or any of his duly authorized representatives;

“Dairy products” mean any product containing milk or any product derived therefrom either in their natural state or as a processed commodity;

“Handler” means any person engaged in the operation of processing, packaging, grading, selling, distributing, offering for sale or marketing any dairy product, or who as owner, agent or otherwise, stores, transports, ships or causes to be shipped any dairy product;

“Marketing” means the sale or offering for sale, at prices at the wholesale levels, of any dairy product;

“Marketing order” means an order issued pursuant to this act;

“Marketing order area” means the state of Wyoming, unless the board divides the state into two (2) or more marketing areas;

“Milk” means the lacteal secretion, practically free from colostrum, obtained by the complete milking of one (1) or more healthy cows or goats;

“Prices at the wholesale levels” or “wholesale prices” mean the prices received by producers, processors or handlers for dairy products for resale, but the terms do not mean the retail prices paid for dairy products by the ultimate consumers thereof;

“Processor” means any person engaged in the operation of receiving, grading, packaging, canning, extracting, preserving, manufacturing or changing the form or state of any dairy product for the purpose of marketing the product;

“Producer” means any person engaged in the business of producing or causing to be produced for marketing any dairy product;

“Proposal” means a suggested or recommended marketing order or the termination of a then existing order, submitted in writing by the director or to the director by any person or group;

“This act” means W.S.

11-36-101

through

11-36-110

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-676; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 11-36-103.
Marketing orders; authority to promulgate.

Subject to this act,
the board may promulgate marketing orders within this state regulating
the distributing, transporting, manufacturing, storing, selling, handling,
marketing, pricing, processing, producing and promoting practices
of dairy products. The board may promulgate orders directed to producers,
processors or handlers, either jointly or individually, within separate
or joint orders, setting forth marketing practices, including prices
or the methods of determining prices at the wholesale levels, to be
received by them for their dairy products.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-677; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-103

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-36-102(a)(xiii).

§ 11-36-104.
Marketing orders; hearing on issuance or termination; notice and
procedure; disposition; minimum pricing; conflicts in area.

Upon receipt of a proposal from any interested person for issuance or termination of a marketing order and upon investigation by the board, if the board has reason to believe that a marketing order or the termination of a marketing order will effectuate the purposes of this act, the board shall afford all interested persons an opportunity for a hearing, after notice. All interested persons shall be afforded an opportunity to present evidence and argument with respect to a proposed marketing order or the termination of a marketing order. Notice of hearing and the procedures observed at the hearing shall be in compliance with the procedures governing contested cases under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

].

At the conclusion of a hearing and after consideration of the evidence received at such hearing, the board shall make written findings of fact and conclusions of law, and may:

Enter a marketing order determining the marketing practices or the minimum prices at the wholesale levels to be paid to producers, processors or handlers for their dairy products;

Enter a marketing order adopting a formula for the determination of prices to be paid to producers, processors or handlers for their dairy products, consistent with the policies of this act; or

Terminate any marketing order issued under this act.

Any marketing order determining minimum wholesale prices or adopting a formula for the determination of such prices may classify producers, handlers or processors, and may further classify any dairy product according to class, form, grade or use, as the board deems advisable, and may specify the minimum wholesale prices or the method of determining minimum wholesale prices therefor. If two (2) or more marketing order areas in the state are governed by different marketing orders, a dairy product which is marketed or handled in one (1) marketing order area but is produced, handled or processed in another marketing order area shall be paid for by the producer, processor or handler according to the prices set forth in the marketing order of the marketing order area where the dairy product is ultimately marketed or handled.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 11-678; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-104

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-36-102(a)(xiii).

§ 11-36-105.
Marketing orders; when issued; economic factors to be considered;
termination.

Upon the conclusion of the hearing provided for in W.S. 11-36-104(a), the board shall issue a marketing order if it makes any of the following findings:

That the order will help to reestablish or maintain wholesale prices received by producers, processors or handlers for any dairy product at levels which are comparable to the general economic conditions within the marketing area. The board may adopt the methods and procedures presently prescribed by the United States department of agriculture in making similar determinations;

That the order will help approach and maintain such comparable general economic conditions at as rapid a rate as is feasible in view of the demand for any dairy product;

That the order will help to prevent economic waste of agricultural resources because of improper preparation of any dairy product for market, because of lack of uniform grading and inspection or because of excessive shipments to markets;

That the order will help to insure a beneficial future for any dairy product;

That the order will help to protect the interests of consumers of any dairy product in assuring an adequate supply.

In making the finding set forth in this section, the board shall take into consideration all facts available to it with respect to the following economic factors, which are not intended to be exclusive of all other economic factors:

The quantity of any dairy product available for distribution;

The quantity of any dairy product normally required for distribution;

The cost of producing, processing or handling any dairy products as determined by available statistics and surveys, including:

The fixed and variable cost of producing, processing or handling, including the reasonable value of the time, skill and experience of the person producing, processing or handling any dairy product;

A fair return upon the value of employed assets of the producer, processor or handler;

Comparable compensation received by persons engaged in other means of earning a livelihood for themselves and their families, as well as any other appropriate factors.

The purchasing power of consumers;

The level of prices of commodities, services and articles that dairy farmers buy; and

The level of prices of other commodities that compete with or are utilized as substitutes for dairy products.

Upon conclusion of the hearing the board shall terminate a marketing order if it determines that the termination thereof will effectuate the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 11-679; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-105

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-36-102(a)(xiii).

§ 11-36-106.
Budget to cover costs; part of orders; assessments.

For the purpose of providing
funds to defray expenses incurred in the administration of this act,
the board shall prepare a budget covering the costs of administration
including advertising and sales promotion when included in any marketing
order. The funding of a budget, together with the assessment of such
fees as are deemed necessary by the board, the time and conditions
of payment of fees, which may not exceed five percent (5%) of the
gross dollar value of commodities regulated by the marketing order,
shall become a part of any marketing order. Every person engaged as
a producer, processor or handler of any marketable dairy product directly
affected by any marketing order for the product, shall pay to the
board, at such time and in such manner as prescribed by the marketing
order, an assessment as determined by the board to fund and cover
the budget.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 11-680; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-106

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-36-102(a)(xiii).

§ 11-36-107.
Deposit
and disbursement of collected monies; biennial audit required.

Any monies collected by the board pursuant to W.S.

11-36-106

shall be deposited with the state treasurer and credited to a separate account for each marketing order under which they are collected and shall be disbursed by the director only for expenses incurred with respect to each separate marketing order. Funds so collected shall be deposited and disbursed in conformity with appropriate rules and regulations prescribed by the board.

All expenditures by the director shall be audited at least biennially by the director of the state department of audit or his designee concurrently with the audit of the department of agriculture, and a copy of the audit shall be delivered within thirty (30) days after completion to the governor and the board.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 11-681; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-107

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund” in (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 11-36-108.
Duty to maintain books and records; failure thereof; confidentiality
required; exceptions.

Any person subject to the provisions of this act or of any marketing order issued pursuant to this act shall:

Maintain books and records prescribed by the board reflecting that person’s operations under this act or the marketing order;

Present upon the board’s request the books and records and any other books and records at a place designated by the board for its inspection or audit;

Furnish authorized representatives of the board such information as requested by them relating to operations of any person subject to this act or to the marketing order and permit the inspection or audit by authorized representatives of the board of the books and records.

Failure or refusal to maintain the books and records prescribed by the board or to furnish any books or records to the board or to its representatives, or to permit inspection or audit thereof, constitutes a violation of this act.

Information obtained by any person hereunder is confidential and shall not be disclosed by that person to any other person except a person employed by the board for the enforcement of this act or an order issued under this act, or to an attorney employed to give legal advice thereupon, or by reason of any public hearing under this act or a court order.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 11-682; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-108

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-36-102(a)(xiii).

§ 11-36-109.
Administration and enforcement; prosecution of violations; hearings
by director; disposition thereof; penalty for violation; injunctions.

The board is responsible for the administration and enforcement of this act and shall adopt and enforce rules and procedures necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.

Upon finding by the director that he has reasonable cause to believe there may have been a violation of any marketing order issued by the board or a violation of this act, the director shall file a complaint in the name of the state of Wyoming against the alleged violator in the district court of the county in which the alleged violation occurred. The alleged violation shall be prosecuted by the attorney general of the state or the district attorney.

Upon filing with the board a complaint by any person other than the director, charging a violation of this act or any marketing order issued by the board, and prior to the institution of any court proceeding, the director may call a hearing to consider the charges set forth in the complaint. At the hearing the director may take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and issue subpoenas for the production of books, records or documents of any kind. Upon conclusion of the hearing:

If the director finds that no violation has occurred, the director shall dismiss the complaint and notify the parties to the complaint of the dismissal;

If the director finds that a violation has occurred, the director shall enter his findings and accordingly notify the parties to the complaint. Should any violator fail, neglect or refuse to desist from the violation or continued violation within the time and manner specified by the director, the director may file a complaint against the violator with the district court of the county in which the violation occurred and the attorney general of the state or the district attorney for the county shall prosecute the violator in the name of the state of Wyoming.

Every person who violates this act or any marketing order issued by the board is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation.

The violation of this act or any marketing order issued by the board may be enjoined by a proceeding brought by the board in the name of the state of Wyoming, prosecuted by the attorney general of this state or by the district attorney for the county wherein the violation occurred, whether or not any assessment has been levied and collected pursuant to W.S.

11-36-106

or whether or not a criminal proceeding has been instituted. Neither the board nor the state may be required to post any bonds otherwise required by law or rules relating to injunctive proceedings.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 11-683; W.S. 1977, §

11-41-109

; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-36-102(a)(xiii).

§ 11-36-110.
Powers of director or board; failure to obey subpoenas; amendment
of orders.

The director or the board, with respect to matters within their respective jurisdictions, may:

Conduct hearings, obtain information and make studies and investigations as to any matter concerning which any question may arise under this act, or as necessary to assist in prescribing any rules, regulations, orders or amendment of orders or in the administration and enforcement of this act and regulations and orders hereunder;

Require any person who is engaged as a producer, processor or handler of any dairy product to furnish any information under oath, affirmation or otherwise, to make and keep records and other documents and to make reports, and require any person to permit the inspection and copying of records and other documents;

Administer oaths and affirmations and whenever necessary, subpoena any person to appear and testify or to appear and produce all books, documents, papers and records at any designated place.

In case of contumacy by or refusal to obey a subpoena served upon any person, the district court for any county in which the person is found or resides or transacts business, upon application by the director or the board, may issue an order requiring the person to appear and give testimony or to appear and produce documents or both. Any failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt.

Upon making appropriate and adequate studies and investigations, the board may amend any order or marketing order promulgated under this act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 87, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 11-685; W.S. 1977, § 11-41-111; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 11-36-102(a)(xiii).

Severability. —

Section 14, ch. 87, Laws 1971, reads: “If any provision or clause of this act or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without such invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared severable.”